Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.300

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Refusal by surety company to pay demand—Action on bond—New bond, suspension or revocation of license on failure to file.

Upon the refusal of the surety company to pay the demand, the director may bring an action on the bond in behalf of vendor and consignor creditors. Upon any action being commenced on the bond, the director may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon the recovery in any action on the bond the licensee shall file a new bond. Upon failure to file the new bond within ten days, such a failure shall constitute grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

[ 2003 c 326 s 81; 1959 c 107 s 30.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.